Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-123.01
Medical history, defined.

Medical history shall mean medical history as defined by the department
in its rules and regulations and
shall include the race, ethnicity, nationality, Indian tribe when applicable
and in compliance with the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, or other cultural
history of both biological parents, if available.

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 22;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 120;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 71;

Laws 2011, LB124, § 2.

Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, see section 43-1501.